Hawaii, session 2026, GM1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that fostering vibrant,
sustainable, and livable communities can support the health,
well-being, and connectivity of all residents. Streets and
public spaces are invaluable resources that, when adapted for
multi-use purposes, can enhance community life by providing safe
and inclusive opportunities for recreation, active
transportation, and cultural engagement. In line with this
vision, the State seeks to establish a summer streets program to
reimagine urban spaces, drawing inspiration from the successful
pilot program initiated in Malmo, Sweden in 2017.
The legislature further finds that Malmo's program
demonstrated the transformative power of temporarily repurposing
streets and public spaces into dynamic areas for pedestrian use,
cycling, and community-centered activities. This initiative not
only encouraged greater public participation and physical
activity, but also bolstered local businesses and improved
environmental outcomes. By creating similar spaces across the
2026-2556 SB3029 GDI SMA.docx 1
miiiBiiiiiniiiiiBiiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
State, the State can build stronger connections between
residents, foster a sense of belonging, and promote healthier
lifestyles,
The State's unique geographic and cultural landscape offers
a compelling opportunity to adapt and expand upon the Malmo
model. Beyond transforming streets, this initiative will
emphasize the importance of creating accessible public spaces
that act as hubs for social interaction, cultural events, and
local markets. These spaces will serve as central gathering
points, enriching the lives of residents and supporting a
stronger sense of community identity.
The legislature believes that a program modeled after
Malmo's program aligns with the State's goal of reducing carbon
emissions, encouraging sustainable transportation, and promoting
community health. By prioritizing active lifestyles and
providing equitable access to public spaces, the program will
address public health challenges, such as physical inactivity,
mental well-being, and social isolation, while supporting local
businesses and reducing environmental impact.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
2026-2556 SB3029 GDI SMA.docx 2
lilMllllilMlilllUIIMIII

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Require each county, in collaboration with the Hawaii
community development authority, to establish a summer
streets pilot program that temporarily closes
vehicular traffic and repurposes roads for pedestrian
and cyclist uses;
(2) Authorize each county to consult with the department
of health regarding best practices for developing the
pilot program;
(3) Require each county to submit an initial proposal to
the executive director of the Hawaii community
development authority;
(4) Require the Hawaii community development authority to
submit a report to the Legislature; and
(5) Appropriate funds for the pilot program.
SECTION 2. (a) Each county, in collaboration with the
Hawaii community development authority, shall establish a summer
streets pilot program that temporarily closes vehicular traffic
and repurposes roads for pedestrian and cyclist use, outdoor
events, temporary installations, and other community-driven
activities.
2026-2556 SB3029 CDl SMA.docx
liiiiiiDinmiiiuiiiiiEisiiiij

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) In developing the summer streets pilot program, each
county shall identify and designate specific streets for
pedestrianization, prioritizing areas that will best benefit
from reduced vehicular traffic, and that are central to local
commerce, cultural activities, and community engagement. The
summer streets pilot program shall support sustainable
transportation options, including the provision of bike lanes
and enhanced pedestrian pathways. Each county may consult with
the department of health regarding the best practices for
developing the pilot program.
(c) Each county shall submit an initial proposal for the
summer streets pilot program, including locations, schedules for
road closures, types of activities and amenities to be provided,
and a breakdown of projected costs to the executive director of
the Hawaii community development authority no later than
March 31, 2027.
(d) The Hawaii community development authority shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including
any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than
July 1, 2027.
2026-2556 SB3029 CDl SMA.docx
iniiiniwniiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
Hawaii community development authority to allocate to each
county for the summer streets pilot program required by this
Act.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
community development authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2556 SB3029 CDl SMA.docx 5
iiiniuimiiiinnMiiiiiiiii

3029
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3029, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
215-26

SB No. 3029, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives